Florida, session 2026, SB212.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âPresent paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of 37 section 775.215, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 38 (e), a new paragraph (d) is added to that subsection, subsection 39 (4) is added to that section, and paragraph (c) of subsection 40 (2) and paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of that section are 41 amended, to read: 42 775.215âResidency restriction for persons convicted of 43 certain sex offenses.â 44 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 45 (d)ââPublic swimming poolâ means a structure that is 46 located either indoors or outdoors and used for recreational 47 bathing or swimming by humans. The term includes a conventional 48 pool, spa-type pool, wading pool, special purpose pool, spray 49 pool, splash pad, or other water recreation attraction, to which 50 admission may be gained with or without payment of a fee, 51 regardless of whether entry to the swimming pool is limited by a 52 gate or other method of controlling access. The term includes 53 swimming pools operated by or serving subdivisions, apartments, 54 condominiums, mobile home parks, or townhouses, or any pool 55 operated by a governmental entity which is held open to the 56 public. The term does not include a swimming pool at a private 57 single-family residence, hotel, motel, or recreational vehicle 58 park, or a swimming pool where the operator prohibits the use of 59 such pool by persons younger than 18 years of age. 60 (2) 61 (c)âThis subsection applies to any person convicted of a 62 violation of s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), 63 or s. 847.0145 for offenses that occurred occur on or after 64 October 1, 2004, and before July 1, 2026, excluding persons who 65 have been removed from the requirement to register as a sexual 66 offender or sexual predator pursuant to s. 943.04354. 67 (3) 68 (c)âThis subsection applies to any person convicted of an 69 offense in another jurisdiction that is similar to a violation 70 of s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), or s. 71 847.0145 if such offense occurred on or after May 26, 2010, and 72 before July 1, 2026, excluding persons who have been removed 73 from the requirement to register as a sexual offender or sexual 74 predator pursuant to s. 943.04354. 75 (4)(a)âA person who has been convicted of a violation of s. 76 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), or s. 847.0145, 77 regardless of whether adjudication has been withheld, in which 78 the victim was less than 16 years of age at the time of the 79 offense, or who has been convicted of a similar offense in 80 another jurisdiction, regardless of whether adjudication has 81 been withheld, in which the victim was less than 16 years of age 82 at the time of the offense, may not reside within 1,000 feet of 83 any school, child care facility, park, playground, or public 84 swimming pool. However, a person does not violate this 85 subsection and may not be forced to relocate if he or she is 86 living in a residence that meets the requirements of this 87 subsection and a school, child care facility, park, playground, 88 or public swimming pool is subsequently established within 1,000 89 feet of his or her residence. 90 (b)âA person who violates this subsection and whose 91 conviction under s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 92 847.0135(5), or s. 847.0145 was classified as a felony of the 93 first degree or higher or whose conviction in another 94 jurisdiction resulted in a penalty that is substantially similar 95 to a felony of the first degree or higher commits a felony of 96 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 97 775.083, or s. 775.084. A person who violates this subsection 98 and whose conviction under s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 99 847.0135(5), or s. 847.0145 was classified as a felony of the 100 second or third degree or whose conviction in another 101 jurisdiction was substantially similar to a felony of the second 102 or third degree commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 103 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 104 (c)âThis subsection applies to: 105 1.âAny person convicted of a violation described in 106 paragraph (a) for offenses that occur on or after July 1, 2026, 107 excluding persons who have been removed from the requirement to 108 register as a sexual offender or sexual predator pursuant to s. 109 943.04354. 110 2.âAny person who is subject to the residency restrictions 111 in subsection (2) or subsection (3) who changes his or her 112 permanent residence on or after July 1, 2026. As used in this 113 subparagraph, the term âpermanent residenceâ means a place where 114 the person abides, lodges, or resides for 3 or more consecutive 115 days which is the personâs home or other place where the person 116 primarily lives. For the purpose of calculating a permanent 117 residence under this subparagraph, the first day that a person 118 abides, lodges, or resides at a place is excluded and each 119 subsequent day is counted. A day includes any part of a calendar 120 day. 121 Section 2.âSection 856.022, Florida Statutes, is amended to 122 read: 123 856.022âLoitering or prowling by certain offenders in close 124 proximity to children; prohibition on contact or communication 125 with children in certain locations; penalty.â 126 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), this section 127 applies to a person convicted of committing, or attempting, 128 soliciting, or conspiring to commit, any of the criminal 129 offenses proscribed in the following statutes in this state or 130 similar offenses in another jurisdiction against a victim who 131 was younger than under 18 years of age at the time of the 132 offense: s. 787.01, s. 787.02, or s. 787.025(2)(c), where the 133 victim is a minor; s. 787.06(3)(g); s. 794.011, excluding s. 134 794.011(10); s. 794.05; former s. 796.03; former s. 796.035; s. 135 800.04; s. 825.1025; s. 827.071; s. 847.0133; s. 847.0135, 136 excluding s. 847.0135(6); s. 847.0137; s. 847.0138; s. 847.0145; 137 s. 985.701(1); or any similar offense committed in this state 138 which has been redesignated from a former statute number to one 139 of those listed in this subsection, if the person has not 140 received a pardon for any felony or similar law of another 141 jurisdiction necessary for the operation of this subsection and 142 a conviction of a felony or similar law of another jurisdiction 143 necessary for the operation of this subsection has not been set 144 aside in any postconviction proceeding. 145 (2)âThis section does not apply to a person who has been 146 removed from the requirement to register as a sexual offender or 147 sexual predator pursuant to s. 943.04354. 148 (3)âA person described in subsection (1) commits loitering 149 and prowling by a person convicted of a sexual offense against a 150 minor if, in committing loitering and prowling, he or she was 151 within 500 300 feet of a place where children were congregating. 152 (4)(a)âIt is unlawful for a person described in subsection 153 (1) to knowingly approach, contact, or communicate with, or 154 approach with the intent to contact or communicate with a person 155 younger than child under 18 years of age in any public park 156 building or on real property comprising any public park, or 157 playground, or public swimming pool. This subsection does not 158 prohibit a person from contacting, communicating with, or 159 approaching with the intent to contact or communicate with, a 160 person younger than 18 years of age if such person is his or her 161 family or household member as defined in s. 741.28 with the 162 intent to engage in conduct of a sexual nature or to make a 163 communication of any type with any content of a sexual nature. 164 This paragraph applies only to a person described in subsection 165 (1) whose offense was committed on or after May 26, 2010. 166 (b)âIt is unlawful for a person described in subsection (1) 167 to knowingly be present in any child care facility or school 168 containing any students in prekindergarten through grade 12 or 169 on real property comprising any child care facility or school 170 containing any students in prekindergarten through grade 12 when 171 the child care facility or school is in operation, if such 172 person fails to: 173 1.âProvide written notification of his or her intent to be 174 present to the school board, superintendent, principal, or child 175 care facility owner that he or she has a conviction specified in 176 subsection (1) and that he or she intends to be present at the 177 school or child care facility; 178 2.âNotify the child care facility owner or the school 179 principalâs office when he or she arrives and departs the child 180 care facility or school; and or 181 3.âRemain under direct supervision of a school official or 182 designated chaperone when present in the vicinity of children. 183 As used in this paragraph, the term âschool officialâ means a 184 principal, a school resource officer, a teacher or any other 185 employee of the school, the superintendent of schools, a member 186 of the school board, a child care facility owner, or a child 187 care provider. 188 (c)âA person is not in violation of paragraph (b) if: 189 1.âThe child care facility or school is a voting location 190 and the person is present for the purpose of voting during the 191 hours designated for voting; or 192 2.âThe person is a parent, grandparent, or legal guardian 193 who is only dropping off or picking up his or her child or 194 grandchild own children or grandchildren at the child care 195 facility or school; or 196 3.âThe person is attending a religious service as defined 197 in s. 775.0861. 198 (5)âA Any person who violates this section commits a 199 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 200 775.082 or s. 775.083. 201 (6)âAs used in this section, the term: 202 (a)ââChild care facilityâ has the same meaning s. 402.302. 203 (b)ââParkâ has the same meaning as in s. 775.215(1). 204 (c)ââPlaygroundâ has the same meaning as in s. 775.215(1). 205 (d)ââPublic swimming poolâ means a structure that is 206 located either indoors or outdoors and used for recreational 207 bathing or swimming by humans, including the area immediately 208 surrounding the structure. The term includes a conventional 209 pool, spa-type pool, wading pool, special purpose pool, spray 210 pool, splash pad, or other water recreation attraction, to which 211 admission may be gained with or without payment of a fee, 212 regardless of whether entry to the swimming pool is limited by a 213 gate or other method of controlling access. The term also 214 includes, but is not limited to, pools operated by or serving 215 camps, churches, governmental entities, day care centers, parks, 216 schools, subdivisions, apartments, condominiums, hotels, motels, 217 mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and townhouses. 218 The term does not include a swimming pool at a private single 219 family residence or a swimming pool where the operator prohibits 220 the use of such pool by persons younger than 18 years of age. 221 (e)ââSchoolâ has the same meaning as in s. 775.215(1). 222 Section 3.âParagraphs (h) and (i) are added to subsection 223 (9) of section 901.15, Florida Statutes, to read: 224 901.15âWhen arrest by officer without warrant is lawful.âA 225 law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant 226 when: 227 (9)âThere is probable cause to believe that the person has 228 committed: 229 (h)âA violation of s. 856.022(4)(a) by knowingly 230 contacting, communicating with, or approaching with the intent 231 to contact or communicate with, a person younger than 18 years 232 of age in any park building or on real property comprising any 233 park, playground, or public swimming pool. 234 (i)âA violation of s. 856.022(4)(b) by knowingly being 235 present in any child care facility or school containing students 236 in prekindergarten through grade 12 or on real property 237 comprising a child care facility or school containing any 238 students in prekindergarten through grade 12 when the child care 239 facility or school is in operation. 240 Section 4.âSection 943.04351, Florida Statutes, is amended 241 to read: 242 943.04351âSearch of registration information regarding 243 sexual predators and sexual offenders required before 244 appointment or employment.âA state agency or governmental 245 subdivision, before making any decision to appoint or employ a 246 person to work, whether for compensation or as a volunteer, at 247 any park, playground, public swimming pool, child care facility 248 day care center, or other place where children regularly 249 congregate, must conduct a search of that personâs name or other 250 identifying information against the registration information 251 regarding sexual predators and sexual offenders through the Dru 252 Sjodin National Sexual Offender Public Website maintained by the 253 United States Department of Justice. If for any reason that site 254 is not available, a search of the registration information 255 regarding sexual predators and sexual offenders maintained by 256 the Department of Law Enforcement under s. 943.043 must shall be 257 performed. This section does not apply to those positions or 258 appointments within a state agency or governmental subdivision 259 for which a state and national criminal history background check 260 is conducted. 261 Section 5.âSubsections (15) and (16) are added to section 262 947.1405, Florida Statutes, to read: 263 947.1405âConditional release program.â 264 (15)âEffective for a releasee who is convicted of a crime 265 committed on or after July 1, 2026, or who has been previously 266 convicted of a crime committed on or after July 1, 2026, in 267 violation of chapter 794, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), 268 or s. 847.0145, against a victim who was younger than 18 years 269 of age at the time of the offense, in addition to any other 270 provision of this section, the commission shall impose the 271 following conditions: 272 (a)âA prohibition on living within 1,000 feet of any public 273 swimming pool, as defined in s. 775.215. A releasee who is 274 subject to this paragraph may not be forced to relocate and does 275 not violate his or her conditional release supervision if he or 276 she is living in a residence that meets the requirements of this 277 paragraph and a public swimming pool is subsequently established 278 within 1,000 feet of his or her residence. 279 (b)âA prohibition on working for pay or as a volunteer at 280 any public swimming pool. 281 (16)âIn addition to all other conditions imposed, for a 282 releasee who is subject to conditional release for a crime that 283 was committed on or after July 1, 2026, and who has been 284 convicted at any time of committing, or attempting, soliciting, 285 or conspiring to commit, any of the criminal offenses listed in 286 s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.a.(I), or a similar offense in another 287 jurisdiction against a victim who was younger than 18 years of 288 age at the time of the offense, if the releasee has not received 289 a pardon for any felony or similar law of another jurisdiction 290 necessary for the operation of this subsection, if a conviction 291 of a felony or similar law of another jurisdiction necessary for 292 the operation of this subsection has not been set aside in any 293 postconviction proceeding, or if the releasee has not been 294 removed from the requirement to register as a sexual offender or 295 sexual predator pursuant to s. 943.04354, the commission must 296 impose a condition prohibiting the releasee from visiting a 297 public swimming pool, as defined in s. 856.022(6), without prior 298 approval from his or her supervising officer. 299 Section 6.âSubsections (6) and (7) are added to section 300 948.30, Florida Statutes, to read: 301 948.30âAdditional terms and conditions of probation or 302 community control for certain sex offenses.âConditions imposed 303 pursuant to this section do not require oral pronouncement at 304 the time of sentencing and shall be considered standard 305 conditions of probation or community control for offenders 306 specified in this section. 307 (6)âIn addition to all other conditions imposed, for a 308 probationer or community controllee whose crime was committed on 309 or after July 1, 2026, and who is placed on supervision for 310 committing, or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit, 311 a violation of s. 787.06(3)(b), (d), (f), or (g); chapter 794; 312 s. 800.04; s. 827.071; s. 847.0135(5); or s. 847.0145 against a 313 victim who was younger than 18 years of age at the time of the 314 offense, the court must impose the following conditions: 315 (a)âA prohibition on living within 1,000 feet of any public 316 swimming pool, as defined in s. 775.215. A probationer or 317 community controllee who is subject to this paragraph may not be 318 forced to relocate and does not violate his or her probation or 319 community control if he or she is living in a residence that 320 meets the requirements of this paragraph and a public swimming 321 pool is subsequently established within 1,000 feet of his or her 322 residence. 323 (b)âA prohibition on working for pay or as a volunteer at 324 any public swimming pool. 325 (7)âIn addition to all other conditions imposed, for a 326 probationer or community controllee who is subject to 327 supervision for a crime that was committed on or after July 1, 328 2026, and who has been convicted at any time of committing, or 329 attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit, any of the 330 criminal offenses listed in s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.a.(I), or a 331 similar offense in another jurisdiction, against a victim who 332 was younger than 18 years of age at the time of the offense, if 333 the offender has not received a pardon for any felony or similar 334 law of another jurisdiction necessary for the operation of this 335 subsection, if a conviction of a felony or similar law of 336 another jurisdiction necessary for the operation of this 337 subsection has not been set aside in any postconviction 338 proceeding, or if the offender has not been removed from the 339 requirement to register as a sexual offender or sexual predator 340 pursuant to s. 943.04354, the court must impose a condition 341 prohibiting the probationer or community controlee from visiting 342 a public swimming pool, as defined in s. 856.022(6), without 343 prior approval from his or her supervising officer. 344 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.